Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.180

Damage prevention account—Deposit of penalties.

All penalties collected pursuant to RCW 19.122.150 must be deposited in the damage prevention account created in RCW 19.122.160.

[ 2011 c 263 s 22.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.